Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Biogas” means  gas that is generated from organic waste or other organic materials
through anaerobic digestion, gasification, pyrolysis or other technology that converts organic
waste to gas.
(b) “Renewable natural gas” is biogas that has been processed to be  interchangeable with
conventional natural gas for the purpose of meeting pipeline quality  standards or transpor-
tation fuel grade requirements.
(2) The State Department of Energy shall  develop, maintain and periodically update an
inventory of biogas and renewable  natural gas resources available to this state. The inven-
tory must include, but need not be limited to:
(a) A list of the potential biogas and renewable natural gas sources in this state  and the
estimated potential production quantities available at each source;
Enrolled Senate Bill 334 (SB 334-A) Page 1
(b) An estimate of the energy content of listed potential biogas and renewable  natural
gas sources;
(c) An estimate of the range of  technologies available to this state for renewable natural
gas production by conversion technologies such as  anaerobic digestion and thermal
gasification; and
(d) A list of the existing biogas production sites in this state that includes:
(A) The location of each site; and
(B) An assessment of the supply-chain infrastructure associated with the site.
(3) The department shall  utilize the inventory required by this section, and any other
relevant information  as considered necessary by the department, to develop and periodically
revise an estimate of:
(a) The potential quantity of renewable natural gas that could be produced in this state
and delivered for use:
(A) As a transportation fuel in the  form of compressed natural gas or liquefied natural
gas; and
(B) By residential, commercial and industrial consumers of natural gas;
(b) The potential for the use of renewable natural  gas in this state to reduce greenhouse
gas emissions;
(c) The potential for renewable natural gas in this state to improve air quality; and
(d) The technical, market, policy and regulatory barriers to developing and  utilizing
renewable natural gas in this state.
(4) The department shall  appoint an advisory committee to assist in developing, main-
taining and periodically updating the inventory required by this section. The committee must
include but not be limited to persons familiar with the renewable natural gas industry. The
committee shall make recommendations to the department:
(a) Regarding the identification and removal of  barriers to producing and utilizing biogas
and renewable natural gas in this state as a means toward providing  the greatest feasible
reductions in greenhouse gas emissions and improvements in air quality;
(b) On establishing policies to promote renewable natural gas; and
(c) On any other matters related to this section, as requested by the department.
SECTION 2.
The State Department of Energy  shall, no later than September 15, 2018,
develop the initial inventory required  by section 1 of this 2017 Act and submit a report on
the initial inventory  to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2017 Act is repealed on December 31, 2018.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 334 (SB 334-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate March 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 1, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 334 (SB 334-A) Page 3